Mississippi statutes. Title 49. Conservation and Ecology
Water Pollution Control Revolving Fund

§ 49-17-81.
Short title.

Sections 49-17-81 through 49-17-89 shall be known and cited as the “Mississippi Water Pollution Control Revolving Fund and Emergency Loan Fund Act.”

HISTORY:
Laws, 1988, ch. 534, § 1; Laws, 1996, ch. 455, § 2, eff from and after October 1, 1996.

§ 49-17-83.
Definitions.

For the purposes of Sections 49-17-81 through 49-17-89, the following words and phrases shall have the meaning ascribed in this section:

“Administrator” means the Administrator of the United States Environmental Protection Agency.

“Commission” means the Mississippi Commission on Environmental Quality.

“Department” means the Mississippi Department of Environmental Quality.

“Emergency fund” means the “Water Pollution Control Emergency Loan Fund” created under Section 49-17-86.

“Loan agreement” means an agreement by and among the commission, a political subdivision and the State Tax Commission to evidence the terms and provisions of a loan under Sections 49-17-81 through 49-17-89.

“Loan fund” means the Water Pollution Abatement Loan Fund created pursuant to Section 49-17-61.

“Municipal security” means a bond, note or other evidence of indebtedness issued by a political subdivision to evidence a loan pursuant to the provisions of Sections 49-17-81 through 49-17-89.

“Political subdivision” means any county, municipality, utility, district, political subdivision, or other governmental unit created under state law.

“Project” means a publicly owned wastewater collection, treatment or disposal system including sludge disposal, renovation, repair and upgrading of existing systems, nonpoint source pollution control management programs and estuary conservation and management programs, and otherwise qualified under rules of the commission pursuant to the federal Water Quality Act of 1987.

“Revolving fund” means the Mississippi Water Pollution Control Revolving Fund created under Section 49-17-85.

“State” means the State of Mississippi.

HISTORY:
Laws, 1988, ch. 534, § 2; Laws, 1991, ch. 578, § 5; Laws, 1996, ch. 455, § 3, eff from and after October 1, 1996.

§ 49-17-85.
Funds established; promulgation of regulations; uses of fund; administrative fees; renegotiation of certain loans.

There is established in the State Treasury a fund to be known as the “Water Pollution Control Revolving Fund,” which shall be administered by the commission acting through the department. The revolving fund may receive bond proceeds and funds appropriated or otherwise made available by the Legislature in any manner and funds from any other source, public or private. The revolving fund shall be maintained in perpetuity for the purposes established in this section.

There is established in the State Treasury a fund to be known as the “Water Pollution Control Hardship Grants Fund,” which shall be administered by the commission acting through the department. The grants fund shall be maintained in perpetuity for the purposes established in this section. Any interest earned on monies in the grants fund shall be credited to that fund.

The commission shall promulgate regulations for the administration of the revolving fund program, the hardship grants program and for related programs authorized under this section. The regulations shall be in accordance with the federal Water Quality Act of 1987, as amended, and regulations and guidance issued under that act. The commission may enter into capitalization grant agreements with the United States Environmental Protection Agency and may accept capitalization grant awards made under Title VI of the Water Quality Act of 1987, as amended.

The commission shall establish a loan program which shall commence after October 1, 1988, to assist political subdivisions in the construction of water pollution control projects. Loans from the revolving fund may be made to political subdivisions as set forth in a loan agreement in amounts not exceeding one hundred percent (100%) of eligible project costs as established by the commission. Notwithstanding loan amount limitations set forth in Section 49-17-61, the commission may require local participation or funding from other sources, or otherwise limit the percentage of costs covered by loans from the revolving fund. The commission may establish a maximum amount for any loan in order to provide for broad and equitable participation in the program.

The commission shall establish a hardship grants program for rural communities, which shall commence after July 1, 1997, to assist severely economically disadvantaged small rural political subdivisions in the construction of water pollution control projects. The commission may receive and administer state or federal funds, or both, appropriated for the operation of this grants program and may take all actions necessary to implement the program in accordance with the federal hardship grants program. The hardship grants program shall operate in conjunction with the revolving loan program administered under this section.

The commission shall act for the state in all matters and with respect to all determinations under Title VI of the federal Water Quality Act of 1987, as amended, and the federal Omnibus Appropriations and Recision Act of 1996.

Except as otherwise provided in this section, the revolving fund may be used only:

To make loans on the condition that:

The loans are made at or below market interest rates, at terms not to exceed the maximum time allowed by federal law after project completion; the interest rate and term may vary from time to time and from loan to loan at the discretion of the commission;

Periodic principal and interest payments will commence when required by the commission but not later than one (1) year after project completion and all loans will be fully amortized when required by the commission but not later than the maximum time allowed by federal law after project completion;

The recipient of a loan will establish a dedicated source of revenue for repayment of loans;

To buy or refinance the debt obligation of political subdivisions at or below market rates, where the debt obligations were incurred after March 7, 1985, and where the projects were constructed in compliance with applicable federal and state regulations;

To guarantee, or purchase insurance for, obligations of political subdivisions where the action would improve credit market access or reduce interest rates;

To provide loan guarantees for similar revolving funds established by municipalities or intermunicipal agencies;

To earn interest on fund accounts;

To establish nonpoint source pollution control management programs;

To establish estuary conservation and management programs;

For the reasonable costs of administering the revolving fund and conducting activities under this act, subject to the limitations established in Section 603(d)(7) of Title VI of the federal Clean Water Act, as amended, and subject to annual appropriation by the Legislature;

In connection with the issuance, sale and purchase of bonds under Section 31-25-1 et seq., related to the funding of projects, to provide security or a pledge of revenues for the repayment of the bonds; and

To pay the principal and interest on bonds issued pursuant to Section 11 of Chapter 580, Laws of 2007, Section 1 of Chapter 492, Laws of 2008, Section 47 of Chapter 557, Laws of 2009, Section 45 of Chapter 533, Laws of 2010, Section 3 of Chapter 480, Laws of 2011, Section 36 of Chapter 569, Laws of 2013, Section 9 of Chapter 452, Laws of 2018, and Section 1 of Chapter 415, Laws of 2019, as they become due; however, only interest and investment earnings on money in the fund may be utilized for this purpose.

The hardship grants program shall be used only to provide hardship grants consistent with the federal hardship grants program for rural communities, regulations and guidance issued by the United States Environmental Protection Agency, subsections (3) and (5) of this section and regulations promulgated and guidance issued by the commission under this section.

The commission shall establish by regulation a system of priorities and a priority list of projects eligible for funding with loans from the revolving fund.

The commission may provide a loan from the revolving fund only with respect to a project if that project is on the priority list established by the commission.

The revolving fund shall be credited with all payments of principal and interest derived from the fund uses described in subsection (7) of this section. However, notwithstanding any other provision of law to the contrary, all or any portion of payments of principal and interest derived from the fund uses described in subsection (7) of this section may be designated or pledged for repayment of a loan as provided in Section 31-25-28 in connection with a loan from the Mississippi Development Bank.

The commission may establish and collect fees to defray the reasonable costs of administering the revolving fund if it determines that the administrative costs will exceed the limitations established in Section 603(d)(7) of Title VI of the federal Clean Water Act, as amended. The administration fees may be included in loan amounts to political subdivisions for the purpose of facilitating payment to the commission. The fees may not exceed five percent (5%) of the loan amount.

Except as otherwise provided in this section, the commission may, on a case-by-case basis and to the extent allowed by federal law, renegotiate the payment of principal and interest on loans made under this section to the six (6) most southern counties of the state covered by the Presidential Declaration of Major Disaster for the State of Mississippi (FEMA-1604-DR) dated August 29, 2005, and to political subdivisions located in such counties; however, the interest on the loans shall not be forgiven for a period of more than twenty-four (24) months and the maturity of the loans shall not be extended for a period of more than forty-eight (48) months.

The commission may, on a case-by-case basis and to the extent allowed by federal law, renegotiate the payment of principal and interest on loans made under this section to Hancock County as a result of coverage under the Presidential Declaration of Major Disaster for the State of Mississippi (FEMA-1604-DR) dated August 29, 2005, and to political subdivisions located in Hancock County.

HISTORY:
Laws, 1988, ch. 534, § 3; Laws, 1991, ch. 535, § 1; Laws, 1991, ch. 578, § 6; Laws, 1997, ch. 416, § 1; Laws, 2002, ch. 490, § 17; Laws, 2004, ch. 570, § 3; Laws, 2006, ch. 545, § 4; Laws, 2007, ch. 580, § 12; Laws, 2008, ch. 492, § 2; Laws, 2009, ch. 557, § 48; Laws, 2010, ch. 533, § 46; Laws, 2011, ch. 480, § 4; Laws, 2013, ch. 569, § 37; Laws, 2014, ch. 530, § 42, eff from and after July 1, 2014; Laws, 2018, ch. 452, § 10, eff from and after July 1, 2018; Laws, 2019, ch. 415, § 2, eff from and after July 1, 2019.

§ 49-17-86.
Water Pollution Control Emergency Loan Fund; short title.

There is created a fund in the State Treasury to be designated as the “Water Pollution Control Emergency Loan Fund” hereinafter referred to as “emergency fund.”

The emergency fund may receive appropriations, bond proceeds, grants, gifts, donations or funds from any source, public or private. The emergency fund shall be credited with all repayments of principal and interest derived from loans made from the emergency fund.

The monies in the emergency fund may be expended only in amounts appropriated by the Legislature.

The emergency fund shall be maintained in perpetuity for the purposes established in Sections 49-17-81 through 49-17-89. Unexpended amounts remaining in the emergency fund at the end of a fiscal year shall not lapse into the State General Fund. Any interest earned on amounts in the emergency fund shall be deposited to the credit of the fund.

The commission shall establish a loan program to assist political subdivisions in making emergency improvements such as repairs to or replacement of machinery, equipment, materials, structures or devices in existing water pollution abatement projects or such other emergency water pollution abatement projects as the commission deems necessary. Loans from the emergency fund may be made to political subdivisions as set forth in a loan agreement in amounts not exceeding one hundred percent (100%) of eligible project costs as established by the commission. The commission may require local participation or funding from other sources, or otherwise limit the percentage of costs covered by loans from the emergency fund. The commission may establish a maximum amount for any loan not to exceed Three Hundred Fifty Thousand Dollars ($350,000.00).

Except as otherwise provided in this section, the emergency fund may be used only:

To make loans on the condition that:

Loans are made at or below market interest rates, at terms not to exceed ten (10) years after project completion; the interest rate may vary from time to time and from loan to loan at the discretion of the commission.

Periodic principal and interest payments will commence when required by the commission but not later than one (1) year after project completion and all loans will be fully amortized when required by the commission but not later than ten (10) years after project completion.

The recipient of a loan shall establish a dedicated source of revenue for repayment of loans. In addition, the commission may require any loan recipient to impose a per connection surcharge on each customer for repayment of any loan funds provided under this section.

The recipient of the loan is not in arrears in repayments to the Water Pollution Control Revolving Fund, the Water Pollution Control Emergency Loan Fund or under the Water Pollution Abatement Loan Program.

To provide financial assistance to political subdivisions in making emergency improvements such as repairs to or replacement of machinery, equipment, materials, structures or devices in existing water pollution abatement projects or such other emergency water pollution abatement projects as the commission deems necessary.

To defray the reasonable costs of administering the emergency fund and conducting activities under this section, subject to annual appropriation by the Legislature.

The commission shall establish a system of evaluating the eligibility of projects, including a determination of the emergency nature of a situation for which funding is sought.

The fund will be credited with all payments of principal and interest derived from the fund uses described in subsection (3) of this section. However, notwithstanding any other provision of law to the contrary, all or any portion of payments of principal and interest derived from the fund uses described in subsection (3) of this section may be designated or pledged for repayment of a loan as provided for in Section 31-25-28 in connection with a loan from the Mississippi Development Bank.

In addition to any amounts allowed under subsection (3) (c), the commission may establish and collect fees to further defray the reasonable costs of administering the emergency fund. Any administrative fees may be included in loan amounts to political subdivisions for the purpose of facilitating payment to the commission; fees may not exceed five percent (5%) of the loan amount. The commission may also use administrative fees collected pursuant to Section 49-17-85 to defray the reasonable costs of administering the emergency fund.

The board may, on a case-by-case basis, renegotiate the payment of principal and interest on loans made under this section to the six (6) most southern counties of the state covered by the Presidential Declaration of Major Disaster for the State of Mississippi (FEMA-1604-DR) dated August 29, 2005, and to political subdivisions located in such counties; however, the interest on the loans shall not be forgiven for a period of more than twenty-four (24) months and the maturity of the loans shall not be extended for a period of more than forty-eight (48) months.

HISTORY:
Laws, 1996, ch. 455, § 1; Laws, 1999, ch. 454, § 17; Laws, 2000, ch. 442, § 1; Laws, 2004, ch. 570, § 4; Laws, 2006, ch. 545, § 5, eff from and after passage (approved Apr. 18, 2006.).

§ 49-17-87.
Pledge of moneys for repayment of loan; loan agreement and repayment schedule; audits; applicability of limitations on indebtedness.

A political subdivision which receives a loan from the revolving fund or emergency fund is required to and authorized to pledge for the repayment of such loan (a) any part of the sales tax reimbursement to which it may be entitled under Section 27-65-75, and (b) any part of the homestead exemption annual tax loss reimbursement to which it may be entitled under Section 27-33-77, to meet a repayment schedule set forth in a loan agreement. The loan agreement shall provide for (i) monthly payments, (ii) semiannual payments or (iii) other periodic payments, the annual total of which shall not exceed the annual total for any other year of the loan by more than fifteen percent (15%). The loan agreement shall provide for the repayment of all funds received from the revolving fund within the maximum time allowed by federal law after project completion and repayment of all funds received from the emergency fund within not more than ten (10) years from the date of project completion. The Department of Revenue shall pay to the revolving fund or emergency fund monthly, or as often as is practicable, from the amount, which would otherwise be remitted to a political subdivision from its sales tax reimbursement or homestead exemption annual tax loss reimbursement, the amounts set forth in such loan agreement.

Before any political subdivision shall receive any loan from the revolving fund or the emergency fund, it shall have executed with the Department of Revenue and the commission a loan agreement evidencing that loan. The loan agreement hereinabove provided for shall not be construed to prohibit any recipient from prepaying any part or all of the funds received.

As determined by the commission, any political subdivision desiring to construct a project approved by the department and which receives a loan from the state for that purpose may be required to pledge as security for the repayment of that loan, all or any part of the revenues of any project constructed, improved, repaired, replaced, purchased or refinanced with the proceeds of such loan. Whenever any project is a part of a system or combined system, then all or any portion of the revenues of that system or combined system may be pledged to secure repayment of a loan as determined by the commission.

The loan agreement shall provide for periodic payments, the annual total of which shall not exceed the annual total for any other year of the loan by more than fifteen percent (15%). The repayment schedule shall provide for the repayment of all funds received from the revolving fund within the maximum time allowed by federal law after project completion and repayment of all funds received from the emergency fund within not more than ten (10) years from the date of project completion. Payments under the loan agreement shall be made prior to the payments of principal or interest on any bonds issued by the political subdivision in connection with the project or projects to which loans from the revolving fund or emergency fund are made.

The State Auditor, upon the request of the commission, shall audit the receipts and expenditures of each district whose monthly payments are to be received by the department, and if the State Auditor should find the political subdivision in arrears, the Auditor shall immediately begin withholding from funds due the taxing district in which the political subdivision is located, under Section 27-33-41, an amount equal to the payment due plus accrued interest, late charges and expenses incurred in the audit and issue a warrant for that amount to the revolving fund or emergency fund as directed below.

The loan agreement hereinabove provided for shall not be construed to prohibit any recipient from prepaying any part or all of the funds received.

Loans or any bonds or other evidences of indebtedness which are incurred or issued either pursuant to this chapter or Section 31-25-1 et seq., in relation to this chapter, or pursuant to any other law as evidence of any loan made or indebtedness incurred pursuant to this chapter, shall not be deemed indebtedness within the meaning specified in Section 21-33-303, with regard to cities or incorporated towns, in Section 19-9-5, with regard to counties, and in any other state law establishing a similar indebtedness limitation with regard to political subdivisions other than cities, incorporated towns and counties.

HISTORY:
Laws, 1988, ch. 534, § 4; Laws, 1991, ch. 578, § 7; Laws, 1994, ch. 418, § 5; Laws, 1996, ch. 455, § 4; Laws, 2015, ch. 313, § 1, eff from and after July 1, 2015.

§ 49-17-89.
Borrowing of monies, issuance of securities, etc., by political subdivisions authorized; issuance of municipal securities; validation of securities; provisions of section supplemental.

Political subdivisions are hereby authorized to borrow monies under the provisions of Sections 49-17-81 through 49-17-89, to issue municipal securities to evidence such loans, and to enter into such other agreements necessary for such loans and municipal securities on such terms and conditions as such political subdivisions shall deem necessary and advisable.

In connection with the issuance of municipal securities by political subdivisions to evidence loans under the provisions of this chapter and as may be required by Section 31-25-1 et seq., the following provisions shall specifically apply:

No notice of intent to issue municipal securities as may otherwise be required by state law shall be required.

The governing body of the political subdivision shall adopt such resolutions as may be necessary to borrow monies under this chapter, to issue and sell municipal securities to evidence such loans, and to approve and authorize the execution of any agreements related thereto.

Such loans and municipal securities shall be secured as provided for in Section 49-17-87.

Such loans and municipal securities shall not be deemed general obligations.

Such municipal securities shall be sold only to evidence the repayment of a loan under this chapter and may be sold at such price or prices, in such form, and subject to such terms and conditions of issue, redemption and maturity, rate of interest and time of payment of interest as otherwise provided for a loan under this chapter.

A political subdivision may pay all expenses, premiums, fees and commissions which it may deem necessary and advantageous in connection with any loan and the issuance and sale of municipal securities under this chapter.

Municipal securities issued under this chapter need not be validated as provided in Section 31-13-1 et seq.

This section shall be deemed to provide an additional, alternate and complete method for the doing of the things authorized hereby and shall be deemed and construed to be supplemental to any provisions of any other laws and not in derogation of any such provisions. In connection with the issuance of municipal securities under this chapter, a political subdivision shall not be required to comply with the provisions of any other law except as provided herein.

HISTORY:
Laws, 1991, ch. 578, § 8, eff from and after passage (approved April 12, 1991).